Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.420

Listing of commercial registered agent.

(1) A person may become listed as a commercial registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a commercial-registered-agent listing statement executed by the person which states:

(a) The name of the individual or the name of the entity, type of entity, and jurisdiction of formation of the entity;

(b) That the person is in the business of serving as a commercial registered agent in this state; and

(c) The address of a place of business of the person in this state to which service of process, notices, and demands being served on or sent to entities represented by the person may be delivered.

(2) A commercial-registered-agent listing statement may include the information regarding acceptance by the agent of service of process, notices, and demands in a form other than a tangible medium as provided in RCW 23.95.450(5).

(3) If the name of a person delivering to the secretary of state for filing a commercial-registered-agent listing statement is not distinguishable on the records of the secretary of state from the name of another commercial registered agent listed under this section, the person shall adopt a fictitious name that is distinguishable and use that name in its statement and when it does business in this state as a commercial registered agent.

(4) The secretary of state shall note the filing of a commercial-registered-agent listing statement in the records maintained by the secretary of state for each entity represented by the agent at the time of the filing. The statement has the effect of amending the registered agent filing for each of those entities to:

(a) Designate the person becoming listed as a commercial registered agent as the commercial registered agent of each of those entities; and

(b) Delete the name and address of the former agent from the registered agent filing of each of those entities.

[ 2020 c 57 s 32; 2015 c 176 s 1405.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.